Illinois, session 104th, HB3372.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Sections 11a-10, 11a-11, and 11a-19 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/11a-10)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-10)7    Sec. 11a-10. Procedures preliminary to hearing. 8    (a) Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to Section 911a-8, the court shall set a date and place for hearing to take 10place within 30 days. The court shall appoint a guardian ad 11litem to report to the court concerning the respondent's best 12interests consistent with the provisions of this Section, 13except that the appointment of a guardian ad litem shall not be 14required when the court determines that such appointment is 15not necessary for the protection of the respondent or a 16reasonably informed decision on the petition. If the guardian 17ad litem is not a licensed attorney, he or she shall be 18qualified, by training or experience, to work with or advocate 19for persons with developmental disabilities, the mentally ill, 20persons with physical disabilities, the elderly, or persons 21with a disability due to mental deterioration, depending on 22the type of disability that is alleged in the petition. The 23court may allow the guardian ad litem reasonable compensation.   HB3372- 2 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1The guardian ad litem may consult with a person who by training 2or experience is qualified to work with persons with a 3developmental disability, persons with mental illness, persons 4with physical disabilities, or persons with a disability due 5to mental deterioration, depending on the type of disability 6that is alleged. The guardian ad litem shall personally 7observe the respondent prior to the hearing and shall inform 8him orally and in writing of the contents of the petition and 9of his rights, including providing a copy of the notice of 10rights required under subsection (e). The guardian ad litem 11shall also attempt to elicit the respondent's position 12concerning the adjudication of disability, the proposed 13guardian, a proposed change in residential placement, changes 14in care that might result from the guardianship, and other 15areas of inquiry deemed appropriate by the court, including 16whether a supported decision-making agreement would be an 17appropriate alternative to guardianship or a limited 18guardianship would be an appropriate alternative to plenary 19guardianship. Notwithstanding any provision in the Mental 20Health and Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act or 21any other law, a guardian ad litem shall have the right to 22inspect and copy any medical or mental health record of the 23respondent which the guardian ad litem deems necessary, 24provided that the information so disclosed shall not be 25utilized for any other purpose nor be redisclosed except in 26connection with the proceedings. At or before the hearing, the   HB3372- 3 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1guardian ad litem shall file a written report detailing his or 2her observations of the respondent, the responses of the 3respondent to any of the inquiries detailed in this Section, 4the opinion of the guardian ad litem or other professionals 5with whom the guardian ad litem consulted concerning the 6appropriateness of guardianship, and any other material issue 7discovered by the guardian ad litem, including whether a 8supported decision-making agreement would be an appropriate 9alternative to guardianship or a limited guardianship would be 10an appropriate alternative to plenary guardianship. The 11guardian ad litem shall appear at the hearing and testify as to 12any issues presented in his or her report.13    (b) The court (1) may appoint counsel for the respondent, 14if the court finds that the interests of the respondent will be 15best served by the appointment, and (2) shall appoint counsel 16upon the respondent's request or if the respondent takes a 17position adverse to that of the guardian ad litem. The 18respondent shall be permitted to obtain the appointment of 19counsel either at the hearing or by any written or oral request 20communicated to the court prior to the hearing. The summons 21shall inform the respondent of this right to obtain appointed 22counsel. The court may allow counsel for the respondent 23reasonable compensation.24    (c) The allocation of guardian ad litem fees and costs is 25within the discretion of the court. No legal fees, appointed 26counsel fees, guardian ad litem fees, or costs shall be   HB3372- 4 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1assessed against the Office of the State Guardian, the public 2guardian, an adult protective services agency, the Department 3of Children and Family Services, or the agency designated by 4the Governor under Section 1 of the Protection and Advocacy 5for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Act.6    (d) The hearing may be held at such convenient place as the 7court directs, including at a facility in which the respondent 8resides.9    (e) Unless he is the petitioner, the respondent shall be 10personally served with a copy of the petition and a summons not 11less than 14 days before the hearing. The summons shall be 12printed in large, bold type and shall include the following:13NOTICE OF RIGHTS OF RESPONDENT14    You have been named as a respondent in a guardianship 15petition asking that you be declared a person with a 16disability. If the court grants the petition, a guardian will 17be appointed for you. A copy of the guardianship petition is 18attached for your convenience.19The date and time of the hearing are: 20The place where the hearing will occur is: 21The Judge's name and phone number is:22    If a guardian is appointed for you, the guardian may be 23given the right to make all important personal decisions for 24you, such as where you may live, what medical treatment you may 25receive, what places you may visit, and who may visit you. A 26guardian may also be given the right to control and manage your   HB3372- 5 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1money and other property, including your home, if you own one. 2You may lose the right to make these decisions for yourself.3    You have the following legal rights:4        (1) You have the right to be present at the court 5    hearing.6        (2) You have the right to be represented by a lawyer, 7    either one that you retain, or one appointed by the Judge.8        (3) You have the right to ask for a jury of six persons 9    to hear your case.10        (4) You have the right to present evidence to the 11    court and to confront and cross-examine witnesses.12        (5) You have the right to ask the Judge to appoint an 13    independent expert to examine you and give an opinion 14    about your need for a guardian.15        (6) You have the right to ask that the court hearing be 16    closed to the public.17        (7) You have the right to tell the court whom you 18    prefer to have for your guardian.19        (8) You have the right to ask a judge to find that 20    although you lack some capacity to make your own 21    decisions, you can make other decisions, and therefore it 22    is best for the court to appoint only a limited guardian 23    for you. 24    You do not have to attend the court hearing if you do not 25want to be there. If you do not attend, the Judge may appoint a 26guardian if the Judge finds that a guardian would be of benefit   HB3372- 6 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1to you. The hearing will not be postponed or canceled if you do 2not attend. If you are unable to attend the hearing in person 3or you will suffer harm if you attend, the Judge can decide to 4hold the hearing at a place that is convenient. The Judge can 5also follow the rule of the Supreme Court of this State, or its 6local equivalent, and decide if a video conference is 7appropriate. 8    IT IS VERY IMPORTANT THAT YOU ATTEND THE HEARING IF YOU DO 9NOT WANT A GUARDIAN OR IF YOU WANT SOMEONE OTHER THAN THE 10PERSON NAMED IN THE GUARDIANSHIP PETITION TO BE YOUR GUARDIAN. 11IF YOU DO NOT WANT A GUARDIAN OR IF YOU HAVE ANY OTHER 12PROBLEMS, YOU SHOULD CONTACT AN ATTORNEY OR COME TO COURT AND 13TELL THE JUDGE.14    Service of summons and the petition may be made by a 15private person 18 years of age or over who is not a party to 16the action.17[END OF FORM] 18    (f) Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be 19given by the petitioner by mail or in person to those persons, 20including the proposed guardian, whose names and addresses 21appear in the petition and who do not waive notice, not less 22than 14 days before the hearing. 23(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22; 102-191, eff. 1-1-22; 24102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 25    (755 ILCS 5/11a-11)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-11)  HB3372- 7 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    Sec. 11a-11. Hearing. 2    (a) The respondent is entitled to be represented by 3counsel, to demand a jury of 6 persons, to present evidence, 4and to confront and cross-examine all witnesses. The hearing 5may be closed to the public on request of the respondent, the 6guardian ad litem, or appointed or other counsel for the 7respondent. Unless excused by the court upon a showing that 8the respondent refuses to be present or will suffer harm if 9required to attend, the respondent shall be present at the 10hearing.11    (b) (Blank).12    (c) (Blank).13    (d) In an uncontested proceeding for the appointment of a 14guardian the person who prepared the report required by 15Section 11a-9 will only be required to testify at trial upon 16order of court for cause shown.17    (e) At the hearing the court shall inquire regarding: (1) 18the nature and extent of respondent's general intellectual and 19physical functioning; (2) the extent of the impairment of his 20adaptive behavior if he is a person with a developmental 21disability, or the nature and severity of his mental illness 22if he is a person with mental illness; (3) the understanding 23and capacity of the respondent to make and communicate 24responsible decisions concerning his person; (4) the capacity 25of the respondent to manage his estate and his financial 26affairs; (5) the appropriateness of proposed and alternate   HB3372- 8 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1living arrangements; (6) the impact of the disability upon the 2respondent's functioning in the basic activities of daily 3living and the important decisions faced by the respondent or 4normally faced by adult members of the respondent's community; 5and (7) the use of a supported decision-making agreement or 6limited guardianship as an alternative to plenary 7guardianship; and (8) any other area of inquiry deemed 8appropriate by the court.9    (f) An authenticated transcript of the evidence taken in a 10judicial proceeding concerning the respondent under the Mental 11Health and Developmental Disabilities Code is admissible in 12evidence at the hearing.13    (g) If the petition is for the appointment of a guardian 14for a beneficiary of the Veterans Administration who has a 15disability, a certificate of the Administrator of Veterans 16Affairs or his representative stating that the beneficiary has 17been determined to be incompetent by the Veterans 18Administration on examination in accordance with the laws and 19regulations governing the Veterans Administration in effect 20upon the date of the issuance of the certificate and that the 21appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the 22payment of any money due the beneficiary by the Veterans 23Administration, is admissible in evidence at the hearing.24(Source: P.A. 98-1094, eff. 1-1-15; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 25    (755 ILCS 5/11a-19)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-19)  HB3372- 9 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    Sec. 11a-19. Notice of right to seek modification. At the 2time of the appointment of a guardian the court shall inform 3the ward of his right under Section 11a-20 to petition for 4termination of adjudication of disability, revocation of the 5letters of guardianship of the estate or person, or both, or 6modification of the duties of the guardian, or modification of 7an adjudication of disability using a limited guardianship or 8termination of guardianship with a supported decision-making 9agreement under the Supported Decision Making Agreement Act 10and shall give the ward a written statement explaining this 11right and the procedures for petitioning the court. The notice 12shall be in large type and shall be in a format substantially 13similar to the following:14IN THE CIRCUIT COURT OF THE ... JUDICIAL CIRCUIT OF ILLINOIS 15... COUNTY 16IN RE THE ESTATE OF             ) 17                                ) 18.....................,          )   CASE NO. .... 19a Person with a Disability,     )  20NOTICE TO WARD OF RIGHT TO SEEK MODIFICATION  21    [Insert name] was appointed your Guardian of the Person on 22[insert date].23    [Insert name] was appointed your Guardian of the Estate on 24[insert date].  HB3372- 10 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    You have the right to ask the court to dismiss this 2guardianship, to revoke the power of this guardian to act for 3you, or to modify the duties of any such guardian.4    You, or someone on your behalf, can make this request, 5even by an informal letter, a telephone call, or a visit to the 6court. You should send your letter to the court at the 7following address; [insert name of judge and mailing address 8of courthouse].9    The court may appoint a Guardian ad Litem to investigate 10and report to the court. You have the right to have a lawyer 11appointed for you, to have a hearing before the court, to have 12a jury of six persons decide the facts, to present evidence and 13tell your story, and to ask witnesses any questions in 14cross-examination.15    Entered this.....day of.............., 20.... 16                                    .................17                                            JUDGE 18[..]    At the time of the appointment of the Guardian in this 19cause, the court informed the ward of his or her rights under 20Section 11a-20 of the Illinois Probate Act and gave the ward, 21in open court, the above-written notice explaining these 22rights and procedures.  23or    HB3372- 11 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1[..]    The Clerk of the Circuit Court shall mail a copy of the 2above-written notice to the above-named person with a 3disability at the residence address set forth in the petition 4filed herein.  5Copy Mailed:................................................. 6                            ................................ 7                                Clerk of the Circuit Court 8[END OF FORM]9(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22.) 10    Section 10. The Supported Decision-Making Agreement Act is 11amended by changing Sections 5, 10, 15, 30, 50, and 70 as 12follows: 13    (755 ILCS 9/5)14    Sec. 5. Purpose; interpretation. The purpose of this Act 15is to recognize a less-restrictive alternative to guardianship 16for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities 17who need assistance with decisions regarding daily living.18    This Act shall be administered and interpreted in 19accordance with the following principles:20        (1) All adults should be able to live in the manner 21    they choose and to accept or refuse support, assistance,   HB3372- 12 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    or protection as long as they do not harm others and are 2    capable of making decisions about those matters.3        (2) All adults should be able to be informed about 4    and, to the best of their ability, participate in 5    decisions regarding daily living.6        (3) All adults should receive the most effective yet 7    least restrictive and intrusive forms of support, 8    assistance, and protection when they are unable to care 9    for themselves or manage their affairs alone.10        (4) The values, beliefs, wishes, cultural norms, and 11    traditions that the principal holds should be respected.12(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 13    (755 ILCS 9/10)14    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:15    "Adult" means a person who is at least 18 years of age.16    "Everyday life decisions" means decisions that support 17one's existence, including, but not limited to, decisions 18regarding medical care and treatment, one's residence, work, 19finances, and social life.20    "Principal" means an adult with intellectual or 21developmental disabilities who seeks to enter, or has entered, 22into a supported decision-making agreement with a supporter 23under this Act.24    "Supported decision-making agreement" means an agreement 25between a principal and a supporter under this Act.  HB3372- 13 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    "Supporter" means an adult who has entered into a 2supported decision-making agreement with a principal under 3this Act.4(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 5    (755 ILCS 9/15)6    Sec. 15. Presumption of capability.7    (a) All adults are presumed to be capable of making 8decisions regarding daily living and to have capacity unless 9otherwise determined by a court. A diagnosis of mental 10illness, intellectual disability, or developmental disability, 11Alzheimer's Disease, or dementia, of itself, does not void the 12presumption of capacity.13    (b) The manner in which an adult communicates with others 14is not grounds for deciding that the adult is incapable of 15managing the affairs of the adult.16    (c) The execution of a supported decision-making agreement 17may not be used as evidence of capacity or incapacity in any 18civil or criminal proceeding, however, the existence of such 19an agreement may be entered into evidence for purposes other 20than as evidence of capacity or incapacity. The execution of a 21supported decision-making agreement and does not preclude the 22ability of the adult who has entered into a supported 23decision-making agreement to act independently of the 24agreement.25(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.)   HB3372- 14 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    (755 ILCS 9/30)2    Sec. 30. Supporter duties.3    (a) Except as otherwise provided by a supported 4decision-making agreement, a supporter may:5        (1) Assist the principal in understanding information, 6    options, responsibilities, and consequences of the life 7    decisions of the principal, including those decisions 8    related to the affairs or support services of the 9    principal.10        (2) Help the principal access, obtain, and understand 11    any information that is relevant to any given life 12    decision, including a medical, psychological, financial, 13    or educational decision, or any treatment records or 14    records necessary to manage the affairs or support 15    services of the principal.16        (3) Assist the principal in finding, obtaining, making 17    appointments for, and implementing the support services or 18    plans for support services of the principal.19        (4) Help the principal monitor information about the 20    affairs or support services of the principal, including 21    keeping track of future necessary or recommended services.22        (5) Ascertain the wishes and decisions of the 23    principal in order to advocate that the wishes and 24    decisions of an individual with disabilities are 25    implemented.  HB3372- 15 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    (b) A supporter shall act with the care, competence, and 2diligence ordinarily exercised by an individual in a similar 3circumstance, with due regard to the possession of, or lack 4of, special skills or expertise.5    (c) A supporter shall complete the seek training developed 6by the Guardianship and Advocacy Commission and education 7regarding the responsibilities and limitations of the 8supporter role within 45 days of signing the consent to act as 9a supporter. The Guardianship and Advocacy Commission shall 10provide public information about this Act and the supporter 11role, responsibilities, and limitations.12    The Guardianship and Advocacy Commission shall develop 13training and education materials for both principals and 14supporters, including, but not limited to, sample agreements 15that will be posted on the website of the Commission along with 16public awareness materials.17(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 18    (755 ILCS 9/50)19    Sec. 50. Agreement instrument. A supported decision-making 20agreement is valid if it substantially follows the following 21form:22"SUPPORTED DECISION-MAKING AGREEMENT 23Important Information for the Supporter: Duties   HB3372- 16 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    If you agree to provide support to the principal, you have 2a duty to:3        (1) act in good faith;4        (2) act within the authority granted in this 5    agreement;6        (3) act loyally and without self-interest; and7        (4) avoid conflicts of interest; and .8        (5) complete the training required by subsection (c) 9    of Section 30.  10Appointment of Supporter 11    I, (insert principal's name), make this agreement of my 12own free will. 13    I agree and designate that the following individual is my 14supporter:15    Name: ...............................................16    Address: ............................................17    Phone Number: .......................................18    Email Address: .......................................... 19    My supporter is to help me make decisions for myself and 20may help me with making everyday life decisions relating to 21the following:22    (Yes/No)   obtaining food, clothing, and shelter.  HB3372- 17 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    (Yes/No)   taking care of my physical and emotional 2health.3    (Yes/No)   managing my financial affairs.4    (Yes/No)   applying for public benefits.5    (Yes/No)   helping me find work.6    (Yes/No)   assisting with residential services.7    (Yes/No)   helping me with school.8    (Yes/No)   helping me advocate for myself. 9    My supporter is not allowed to make decisions for me. To 10help me with my decisions, my supporter may:11        (1) help me access, collect, or obtain information 12    that is relevant to a decision, including medical, 13    psychological, financial, educational, housing, and 14    treatment records;15        (2) help me understand my options so that I can make an 16    informed decision; and17        (3) help me communicate my decision to appropriate 18    persons. 19    I want my supporter to have:20        (Yes/No)  A release allowing my supporter to see 21    protected health information under the Health Insurance 22    Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 is attached.23        (Yes/No)  A release allowing my supporter to see 24    confidential information under the Mental Health and   HB3372- 18 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act is 2    attached.3        (Yes/No)  A release allowing my supporter to see 4    educational records under the Family Educational Rights 5    and Privacy Act of 1974 and the Illinois School Records 6    Act is attached.7        (Yes/No)  A release allowing my supporter to see 8    substance abuse records under Confidentiality of Alcohol 9    and Drug Abuse Patient Records regulations is attached. 10    This supported decision-making agreement is effective 11immediately and will continue until (insert date) or until the 12agreement is terminated by my supporter or me or by operation 13of law.14    Signed this .... day of ........, 20....  15    (Signature of Principal)   (Printed name of principal) 16Consent of Supporter 17    I, (name of supporter), consent to act as a supporter 18under this agreement. 19    (Signature of supporter)  (Printed name of supporter)20    (Witness 1 signature)      (Printed name of witness 1)21    (Witness 2 signature)      (Printed name of witness 2)   HB3372- 19 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1WARNING: PROTECTION FOR THE ADULT WITH A DISABILITY 2IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A COPY OF THIS AGREEMENT OR IS AWARE 3OF THE EXISTENCE OF THIS AGREEMENT HAS CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT 4THE ADULT WITH A DISABILITY IS BEING ABUSED, NEGLECTED, OR 5EXPLOITED BY THE SUPPORTER, THE PERSON SHALL REPORT THE 6ALLEGED ABUSE, NEGLECT, OR EXPLOITATION TO THE ADULT 7PROTECTIVE SERVICES HOTLINE: 1-866-800-1409, 1-888-206-1327 8(TTY)." 9     This form is not intended to exclude other forms or 10agreements that identify the principal, supporter, and types 11of supports.12(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 13    (755 ILCS 9/70)14    Sec. 70. Term of agreement; revocation.15    (a) A supported decision-making agreement extends until 16terminated by either party or by the terms of the agreement.17    (b) A supported decision-making agreement is terminated 18if:19        (1) the Office of Inspector General or Adult 20    Protective Services substantiated an allegation of abuse 21    or neglect by the supporter; or22        (2) there is a restraining order against the supporter   HB3372- 20 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    by or on behalf of the principal; .2        (3) the principal revokes the agreement;3        (4) the supporter resigns;4        (5) ordered by a court; or5        (6) the agreement includes a termination date. 6    (b-5) A supported decision-making agreement is suspended 7while:8        (1) the conditions of Section 15 of the Health Care 9    Surrogate Act are met;10        (2) a medical or psychological evaluation has 11    concluded that the principal lacks decisional capacity but 12    a subsequent evaluation has not yet found the principal's 13    decisional capacity restored; or14        (3) the agency established in a durable power of 15    attorney has begun but not yet terminated. 16    (c) A principal may revoke his or her supported 17decision-making agreement and invalidate the supported 18decision-making agreement at any time by:19        (1) canceling or destroying the supported 20    decision-making agreement or directing another in the 21    presence of the principal to destroy the decision-making 22    agreement;23        (2) executing a statement, in writing, that is signed 24    and dated by the principal, expressing his or her intent 25    to revoke the supported decision-making agreement; or26        (3) verbally expressing the intent of the principal to   HB3372- 21 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1    revoke the supported decision-making agreement in the 2    presence of 2 witnesses. 3    (d) Unless the supported decision-making agreement 4provides a different method for the resignation of the 5supporter support, a supporter may resign by giving notice to 6the principal.7    (e) The last signed agreement holds.8    (f) Upon the filing of a petition by an interested person, 9a court may suspend or terminate a supported decision-making 10agreement when necessary to ensure the well-being and safety 11of the principal. 12(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.)  HB3372- 22 -LRB104 10553 JRC 20629 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    755 ILCS 5/11a-10from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-104    755 ILCS 5/11a-11from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-115    755 ILCS 5/11a-19from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-196    755 ILCS 9/57    755 ILCS 9/108    755 ILCS 9/159    755 ILCS 9/3010    755 ILCS 9/5011    755 ILCS 9/70